Utah statutes.
53-3-504.   Licenses required -- Inspections.
(1)  A commercial driver training school or a commercial testing only school
may be established only if the school applies for and obtains a license from
the division.
(2)  A person may act as an instructor or school operator only if the person
applies for and obtains a license from the division.
(3)  The  division shall inspect the school facilities and equipment of
applicants and licensees and examine applicants for instructor's licenses.
(4)  The division shall administer and enforce this part.
